Utah statutes.
15-7-5.   Execution of obligations.

(1) A certificated registered public obligation shall be executed by the issuer by the manual or facsimile signature or signatures of authorized officers. Any signature of an authorized officer may be attested by the manual or facsimile signature of another authorized officer.

(2)  In addition to the signatures referred to in Subsection (1), any certificated registered public obligation or any writing relating to an uncertificated registered public obligation may include a certificate or certificates signed by the manual or facsimile signature of an authenticating agent, registrar, transfer agent, or the like.

(3)  At least one signature of an authorized officer or other persons required or permitted to be placed on a certificated registered public obligation shall be the manual signature.

